Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.081

Escrow officer's license—Application—Form—Timely filing—Proof of moral character, etc.

Any person desiring to be a licensed escrow officer shall meet the requirements of RCW 18.44.195 as provided in this chapter. The applicant shall make application endorsed by a licensed escrow agent to the director on a form to be prescribed and furnished by the director. Such application must be received by the director within one year of passing the escrow officer examination. With this application the applicant shall:

(1) Pay a license fee as set forth by rule; and

(2) Furnish such proof as the director may require concerning his or her honesty, truthfulness, good reputation, and identity, including but not limited to fingerprints, residential address and telephone number, qualifications and employment history, a personal credit report, and any other information required under RCW 18.44.031.

[ 1999 c 30 s 24; 1995 c 238 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 22. Formerly RCW 18.44.290.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 238: See note following RCW 18.44.011.